Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-1222
Revenue bonds; city may purchase for investment or retirement.

The governing body of the city shall have the right to purchase for investment of other funds, and the bridge commission and the governing body of the city shall have the right to purchase for retirement and cancellation, any of such bonds that may be outstanding, at the market price, but at not exceeding one hundred and five and accrued interest and not exceeding the price, if any, at which the same shall in the same year be redeemable, but all bonds redeemed or purchased out of funds provided by the sale of bridge bonds shall forthwith be canceled and shall not again be issued.

Laws 1929, c. 176, § 10, p. 620;

C.S.1929, § 14-1210;

Laws 1931, c. 27, § 2, p. 109;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 14-1210;

R.S.1943, § 14-1222.